Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0698.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15. (1) The secretary of state shall do all of the following: (a) Make available through his or her the secretary of state's offices, and furnish to county clerks, appropriate forms, instructions, and manuals required by this act. (b) Develop a filing, coding, and cross-indexing system for the filing of required reports and statements consistent with this act, and supervise the implementation of the filing systems by the clerks of the counties. (c) Receive all statements and reports required by this act to be filed with the secretary of state. (d) Prepare forms, instructions, and manuals required under this act. (e) Promulgate rules and issue declaratory rulings to implement this act in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (f) Upon On receipt of a written request and the required filing, waive payment of a late filing fee if the request for the waiver is based on good cause and accompanied by adequate documentation. One or more of the following reasons constitute good cause for a late filing fee waiver: (i) The incapacitating physical illness, hospitalization, accident involvement, death, or incapacitation for medical reasons of a person an individual required to file, a person an individual whose participation is essential to the preparation of the statement or report, or a member of the immediate family of these persons.individuals. (ii) Other unique, unintentional factors beyond the filer's control not stemming from a negligent act or nonaction so that a reasonably prudent person would excuse the filing on a temporary basis. These factors include the loss or unavailability of records due to a fire, flood, theft, or similar reason and difficulties related to the transmission of the filing to the filing official, such as exceptionally bad weather or strikes involving transportation systems. (2) A The secretary of state shall issue a declaratory ruling shall be issued under this section only if the person requesting the ruling has provided a reasonably complete statement of facts necessary for the ruling or if the person requesting the ruling has, with the permission of the secretary of state, supplied supplemental facts necessary for the ruling. A request for a declaratory ruling that is submitted to the secretary of state shall must be made available for public inspection within not later than 48 hours after its receipt. An interested person may submit written comments regarding the request to the secretary of state within not later than 10 business days after the date the request is made available to the public. Within Not later than 45 business days after receiving a declaratory ruling request, the secretary of state shall make a proposed response available to the public. An interested person may submit written comments regarding the proposed response to the secretary of state within not later than 5 business days after the date the proposal is made available to the public. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the secretary of state shall issue a declaratory ruling within not later than 60 business days after a request for a declaratory ruling is received. If the secretary of state refuses to issue a declaratory ruling, the secretary of state shall notify the person making the request of the reasons for the refusal and shall issue an interpretative statement providing an informational response to the question presented within the same time limitation applicable to a declaratory ruling. A declaratory ruling or interpretative statement issued under this section shall must not state a general rule of law, other than that which is stated in this act, until the general rule of law is promulgated by the secretary of state as a rule under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, or under judicial order. (3) Under extenuating circumstances, the secretary of state may issue a notice extending for not more than 30 business days the period during which the secretary of state shall respond to a request for a declaratory ruling. The secretary of state shall not issue more than 1 notice of extension for a particular request. A person requesting a declaratory ruling may waive, in writing, the time limitations provided by this section. (4) The secretary of state shall make available to the public an annual summary of the declaratory rulings and interpretative statements issued by the secretary of state. (5) A person may file with the secretary of state a complaint that alleges a violation of this act. Within Not later than 5 business days after a complaint that meets the requirements of subsection (6) is filed, the secretary of state shall give notice to the person against whom the complaint is filed. The notice shall must include a copy of the complaint. Within Not later than 15 business days after this notice is mailed, the person against whom the complaint was filed may submit a response to the secretary of state. The secretary of state may extend the period for submitting a response an additional 15 business days for good cause. The secretary of state shall provide a copy of a response received to the complainant. Within Not later than 10 business days after the response is mailed, the complainant may submit a rebuttal statement to the secretary of state. The secretary of state may extend the period for submitting a rebuttal statement an additional 10 business days for good cause. The secretary of state shall provide a copy of the rebuttal statement to the person against whom the complaint was filed. (6) A complaint filed under subsection (5) shall must satisfy all of the following requirements: (a) Be signed by the complainant. (b) State the name, address, and telephone number of the complainant. (c) Include the complainant's certification that, to the best of the complainant's knowledge, information, and belief, formed after a reasonable inquiry under the circumstances, each factual contention of the complaint is supported by evidence. However, if, after a reasonable inquiry under the circumstances, the complainant is unable to certify that certain factual contentions are supported by evidence, the complainant may certify that, to the best of his or her the complainant's knowledge, information, or belief, there are grounds to conclude that those specifically identified factual contentions are likely to be supported by evidence after a reasonable opportunity for further inquiry. (7) The secretary of state shall develop a form that satisfies the requirements of subsection (6) and may be used for the filing of complaints. (8) A person who files a complaint with a false certificate under subsection (6)(c) is responsible for a civil violation of this act. A person may file a complaint under subsection (5) alleging that another person has filed a complaint with a false certificate under subsection (6)(c). (9) The secretary of state shall investigate the allegations under the rules promulgated under this act. If the violation involves the secretary of state, the immediate family of the secretary of state, or a campaign or committee with which the secretary of state is connected, directly or indirectly, the secretary of state shall refer the matter to the attorney general to determine whether a violation of this act has occurred. (10) No Not later than 45 business days after receipt of a rebuttal statement submitted under subsection (5), or if no response or rebuttal is received under subsection (5), the secretary of state shall post on the secretary of state's Internet website whether or not there may be reason to believe that a violation of this act has occurred. When the secretary of state determines whether there may be reason to believe that a violation of this act occurred or did not occur or determines to terminate its proceedings, the secretary of state shall, within not later than 30 days of after that determination, post on the secretary of state's Internet website any complaint, response, or rebuttal statement received under subsection (5) regarding that violation or alleged violation and any correspondence that is dispositive of that violation or alleged violation between the secretary of state and the complainant or the person against whom the complaint was filed. If the secretary of state determines that there may be reason to believe that a violation of this act occurred, the secretary of state shall endeavor to correct the violation or prevent a further violation by using informal methods such as a conference, conciliation, or persuasion, and may enter into a conciliation agreement with the person involved. Unless violated, a conciliation agreement is a complete bar to any further civil or criminal action with respect to matters covered in the conciliation agreement. The secretary of state shall, within not later than 30 days after a conciliation agreement is signed, post that agreement on the secretary of state's Internet website. If, after 90 business days, the secretary of state is unable to correct or prevent further violation by these informal methods, the secretary of state shall do either of the following: (a) Refer the matter to the attorney general for the enforcement of any criminal penalty provided by this act. (b) Commence a hearing as provided in subsection (11) for enforcement of any civil violation. (11) The secretary of state may commence a hearing to determine whether a civil violation of this act has occurred. The hearing shall must be conducted in accordance with the procedures set forth in chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.287. 24.288. If after a hearing the secretary of state determines that a violation of this act has occurred, the secretary of state may issue an order requiring the person to pay a civil fine not more than triple the amount of the improper contribution or expenditure plus not more than $1,000.00 for each violation. (12) A final decision and order issued by the secretary of state is subject to judicial review as provided by chapter 6 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.301 to 24.306. The secretary of state shall deposit a civil fine imposed under this section in the general fund. The secretary of state may bring an action in circuit court to recover the amount of a civil fine. (13) When a report or statement is filed under this act, the secretary of state shall review the report or statement and may investigate an apparent violation of this act under the rules promulgated under this act. If the secretary of state determines that there may be reason to believe a violation of this act has occurred and the procedures prescribed in subsection (10) have been complied with, the secretary of state may refer the matter to the attorney general for the enforcement of a criminal penalty provided by this act, or commence a hearing under subsection (11) to determine whether a civil violation of this act has occurred. (14) No Not later than 60 business days after a matter is referred to the attorney general for enforcement of a criminal penalty, the attorney general shall determine whether to proceed with enforcement of that penalty. (15) Unless otherwise specified in this act, a person who violates a provision of this act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation. A civil fine is in addition to, but not limited by, a criminal penalty prescribed by this act. (16) In addition to any other sanction provided for by this act, the secretary of state may require a person who files a complaint with a false certificate under subsection (6)(c) to do either or both of the following: (a) Pay to the secretary of state some or all of the expenses incurred by the secretary of state as a direct result of the filing of the complaint. (b) Pay to the person against whom the complaint was filed some or all of the expenses, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney fees incurred by that person in proceedings under this act as a direct result of the filing of the complaint. (17) Except as otherwise provided in section 57, there There is no private right of action, either in law or in equity, under this act. Except as otherwise provided in section 57, the The remedies provided in this act are the exclusive means by which this act may be enforced and by which any harm resulting from a violation of this act may be redressed. The criminal penalties provided by this act may only be enforced by the attorney general and only upon on referral by the secretary of state as provided under subsection (10) or (13). (18) The secretary of state may waive the filing of a campaign statement required under section 33 , 34, or 35 if the closing date of the particular campaign statement falls on the same or a later date as the closing date of the next campaign statement filed by the same person, or if the period that would be otherwise covered by the next campaign statement filed by the same person is 10 days or less. (19) The clerk of each county shall do all of the following: (a) Make available through the county clerk's office the appropriate forms, instructions, and manuals required by this act. (b) Under the supervision of the secretary of state, implement the filing, coding, and cross-indexing system prescribed for the filing of reports and statements required to be filed with the county clerk's office. (c) Receive all statements and reports required by this act to be filed with the county clerk's office. (d) Upon On written request, waive the payment of a late filing fee if the request for a waiver is based on good cause as prescribed in subsection (1)(f). Sec. 16. (1) A filing official shall make a statement or report required to be filed under this act available for public inspection and reproduction, as soon as practicable, but not later than the third business day following the day on which it is received, during regular business hours of the filing official. If the report is a report of a late contribution under section 32(1) made to the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall also make the report or all of the contents of the report available to the public on the internet, without charge, as soon as practicable but not later than the end of the business day on which it is received, at a single website established and maintained by the secretary of state. (2) A filing official shall provide a copy of a statement or part of a statement shall be provided by a filing official at a reasonable charge. (3) A statement open to the public under this act shall must not be used for any commercial purpose. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a statement of organization filed under this act with a filing official who is not the secretary of state shall must be preserved by that filing official for 5 years from after the official date of the committee's dissolution. A statement of organization filed under this act with a filing official who is not the secretary of state that is filed by a committee that received more than $50,000.00 in an election cycle shall must be preserved by that filing official for 15 years from after the official date of the committee's dissolution. A statement of organization filed under this act with the secretary of state shall must be preserved by the secretary of state for 15 years from after the official date of the committee's dissolution. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any other statement or report filed under this act with a filing official who is not the secretary of state shall must be preserved by that filing official for 5 years from after the date the filing occurred. Any other statement or report filed under this act with a filing official who is not the secretary of state that is filed by a committee that received more than $50,000.00 in an election cycle shall must be preserved by that filing official for 15 years from after the date the filing occurred. Any other statement or report filed under this act with the secretary of state shall must be preserved by the secretary of state for 15 years from after the date the filing occurred. Upon On a determination under section 15 that a violation of this act has occurred, all complaints, orders, decisions, or other documents related to that violation shall must be preserved by the filing official who is not the secretary of state or the secretary of state for 15 years from after the date of the court determination is issued or the date the violations are corrected, whichever is later. Statements and reports filed under this act may be reproduced pursuant to under the records reproduction act, 1992 PA 116, MCL 24.401 to 24.406. After the required preservation period, the statements and reports, or the reproductions of the statements and reports, may be disposed of in the manner prescribed in the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, and section 11 of the Michigan history center act, 2016 PA 470, MCL 399.811. (5) A Except for a late filing fee required under this act, a filing official shall not collect a charge for the filing of a required statement or report or for a form upon on which the statement or report is to be prepared. , except a late filing fee required by this act. (6) A filing official shall determine whether a statement or report filed under this act complies, on its face, with the requirements of this act and the rules promulgated under this act. The filing official shall determine whether a statement or report that is required to be filed under this act is in fact filed. Within Not later than 4 business days after the deadline for filing a statement or report under this act, the filing official shall give notice to the filer by registered mail of an error or omission in the statement or report and give notice to a person the filing official has reason to believe is a person required to and who failed to file a statement or report. A failure to give notice by the filing official under this subsection is not a defense to a criminal action against the person required to file. (7) Within Not later than 9 business days after the report or statement is required to be filed, the filer shall make any corrections in the statement or report filed with the appropriate filing official. If the report or statement was not filed, then the report or statement shall must be late filed within not later than 9 business days after the time it was required to be filed and shall be is subject to late filing fees. (8) After 9 business days and before 12 business days have expired after the deadline for filing the statement or report, the filing official shall report errors or omissions that were not corrected and failures to file to the attorney general. (9) A statement or report required to be filed under this act shall must be filed not later than 5 p.m. of the day in which it is required to be filed. A preelection statement or report due on July 25 or October 25 under section 33 that is postmarked by registered or certified mail, or sent by express mail or other overnight delivery service, at least 2 days before the deadline for filing is filed within the prescribed time regardless of when it is actually delivered. Any other statement or report required to be filed under this act that is postmarked by registered or certified mail or sent by express mail or other overnight delivery service on or before the deadline for filing is filed within the prescribed time regardless of when it is actually delivered. Sec. 17. (1) A person paying a late filing fee as a result of that person's failure to file a statement or report shall pay that fee to the filing official with whom the statement or report was required to be filed. (2) The late filing fees collected under sections 24, 33, 34, 35, and 51, and copying charges collected under section 16, must be retained by and for the use of the filing officials collecting the fees or charges to cover their expenses in administering this act. A late filing fee assessed by a county clerk that remains unpaid for more than 60 days is considered a debt of the county, and the county treasurer shall collect that fee in the same manner as other county debts are collected. A late filing fee assessed by the secretary of state that remains unpaid for more than 180 days must be referred to the department of treasury for collection. (3) A committee, other than a candidate committee or a committee making expenditures in assistance of or in opposition to the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question, required to file with the secretary of state is not required to pay a late filing fee under sections 24 , and 33 , 34, and 35, if all of the following conditions are met: (a) A committee required to register as a committee fails to file a statement of organization. (b) The secretary of state sends to that committee notice of the committee's failure to file a statement of organization. (c) At the same time or after the notice described in subdivision (b) is sent, the secretary of state sends to that committee notice of the committee's failure to file a campaign statement that was due for a period that occurred before the notice of failure to file a statement of organization was sent. (d) Within Not later than 10 business days after the notice of failure to file a statement of organization is sent, the committee files a statement of organization. (e) Within Not later than 10 business days after the notice of failure to file a campaign statement is sent, the committee files every campaign statement that is due. (4) Late filing fees that would have occurred except for subsection (3) must be assessed for each statement not filed before the eleventh business day after a notice of failure to file is sent under subsection (3). (5) A committee other than a candidate committee that has not previously filed a statement of organization is not required to pay a late filing fee under sections 24 , and 33 , 34, and 35, if the committee files a statement of organization and every campaign statement that is due, before the secretary of state sends a notice to that committee under subsection (3). Sec. 24b. (1) One or more persons may create an independent expenditure committee and shall file a statement of organization under section 24. An independent expenditure committee shall file campaign statements under sections section 33 and 35 and as otherwise provided in this act. (2) An independent expenditure committee may receive contributions from any person, except a person prohibited from making a contribution under 52 USC 30121. An independent expenditure committee shall return a contribution made by a person prohibited from making a contribution under this subsection within not later than 30 business days after receiving that contribution. (3) In addition to any independent expenditures or other disbursements not prohibited by this act or any other law, an independent expenditure committee may make contributions to another independent expenditure committee or to a ballot question committee. (4) An independent expenditure committee shall not make a contribution to a candidate committee, independent committee, political committee, political party committee, or house or senate political party caucus committee. (5) An individual who knowingly violates or causes a person to violate subsection (4) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 3 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. A person that violates subsection (4) that is not an individual is subject to 1 of the following, whichever is greater: (a) A fine of not more than $20,000.00. (b) A fine of not more than triple the amount of the improper contribution or expenditure. Sec. 33. (1) A committee, other than an independent committee, an independent expenditure committee, or a political committee required to file with the secretary of state, supporting or opposing a candidate shall file complete campaign statements as required by this act and the rules promulgated under this act according to the following schedule: (a) A preelection campaign statement must be filed not later than the eleventh day before an election. The closing date for a campaign statement filed under this subdivision is the sixteenth day before the election. (b) A postelection campaign statement must be filed not later than the thirtieth day following the election. The closing date for a campaign statement filed under this subdivision is the twentieth day following the election. A committee supporting a candidate who loses the primary election shall file closing campaign statements in accordance with this section. If all liabilities of that candidate or committee are paid before the closing date and additional contributions are not expected, the campaign statement may be filed at any time after the election, but not later than the thirtieth day following the election. (c) For candidate committees only, in a year in which there is no election for the candidate the candidate committee is supporting or opposing: (i) Not later than July 25 with a closing date of July 20 of that year. (ii) Not later than October 25 with a closing date of October 20 of that year. (2) For the purposes of subsection (1): (1) Candidate committees shall file a postelection campaign statement following the election in which the candidate appeared on the ballot as follows: (a) A candidate committee shall file a preelection campaign statement and a postelection campaign statement for each election in which the candidate seeks nomination or election. , except if an individual becomes a candidate after the closing date for the preelection campaign statement only the postelection campaign statement is required for that election. (b) A candidate committee shall file a postelection campaign statement not more than 14 days after the election. The closing date for a campaign statement filed under this subdivision is 7 days after the election. If all liabilities of the candidate or committee are paid before the closing date and additional contributions are not expected, the committee may file the campaign statement any time between the election and 14 days after the election. (c) A committee supporting a candidate who loses the primary election shall file a closing campaign statement under this section. (2) If a candidate appears on the ballot during an election that occurs on a date other than a regular election date as described under section 641(1) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.641, the candidate shall do all of the following, as applicable: (a) File a postelection campaign statement required under subsection (1). (b) If the date of the election is more than 16 days after the due date of a campaign statement required under subsection (4), file a pre-election campaign statement not later than 11 days before the special election. The closing date for a campaign statement filed under this subdivision is 16 days before the election. Notwithstanding other reports required under this act, if the date of the election under this subsection is less than 17 days after the due date of a campaign statement required under subsection (4), the committee has no additional reporting obligations. (3) (b) A committee other than a candidate committee shall file a campaign statement for each period during which expenditures are made for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of a candidate or for the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question. (4) (3) An independent committee, an independent expenditure committee, or a political committee other than a house political party caucus committee or senate political party caucus committee required to file with the secretary of state All committees shall file campaign statements as required by this act according to the following schedule: (a) Not later than February 15 of each year with a closing date of February 10 of that year. (b) (a) Not later than April 25 of each year with a closing date of April 20 of that year. (c) (b) Not later than July 25 of each year with a closing date of July 20 of that year. (d) (c) Not later than October 25 of each year with a closing date of October 20 of that year. (5) A ballot question committee supporting or opposing a statewide ballot question shall file a campaign statement not later than 35 days after the petition form is filed under section 483a of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.483a, with a closing date 28 days after the filing of the petition form. (6) A separate segregated fund filing a campaign statement under this section shall report on the campaign statement the number of items for each item type sold or offered in exchange for a contribution for fundraising purposes where a connected organization paid any costs of the item under section 55(8) during the reporting period covered by the campaign statement. (7) (4) A In addition to the campaign statement reports required under subsection (4), a house political party caucus committee or a senate political party caucus committee required to file with the secretary of state or a political party committee for a party attempting to qualify as a new political party under section 685 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.685, shall file campaign statements as required by this act according to the following schedule: (a) Not later than January 31 of each year with a closing date of December 31 of the immediately preceding year. (b) Not later than April 25 of each year with a closing date of April 20 of that year. (c) Not later than July 25 of each year with a closing date of July 20 of that year. (d) Not later than October 25 of each year with a closing date of October 20 of that year. (a) (e) For the period beginning on the fourteenth day 14 days immediately preceding a primary or special primary election and ending on the day immediately following the primary or special primary election, not later than 4 p.m. each business day with a closing date of the immediately preceding day, only for a contribution received or expenditure made that exceeds $1,000.00 per day. (b) (f) For the period beginning on the fourteenth day 14 days immediately preceding a general or special election and ending on the day immediately following the general or special election, not later than 4 p.m. each business day with a closing date of the immediately preceding day, only for a contribution received or expenditure made that exceeds $1,000.00 per day. (8) (5) Notwithstanding subsection (3) (1) or (4) or section 51, if an independent expenditure is made within 45 days before a special election by an independent committee, an independent expenditure committee, or a political committee required to file a campaign statement with the secretary of state, the committee shall file a report of the expenditure with the secretary of state within not later than 48 hours after the expenditure. The report must be made on a form provided by the secretary of state and must include the date of the independent expenditure, the amount of the expenditure, a brief description of the nature of the expenditure, and the name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was paid. The brief description of the expenditure must include either the name of the candidate and the office sought by the candidate or the name of the ballot question and state whether the expenditure supports or opposes the candidate or ballot question. This subsection does not apply if the committee is required to report the independent expenditure in a campaign statement that is required to be filed before the date of the election for which the expenditure was made. (9) (6) A candidate committee or a committee other than a candidate committee that files a written statement under section 24(5) or (6) or that is automatically considered to have made a statement under section 24(5) is not required to file a campaign statement under subsection (1) , (3), or (4) unless it received or expended an amount in excess of $1,000.00. If the committee receives or expends an amount in excess of $1,000.00 during a period covered by a filing, the committee is then subject to the campaign filing requirements under this act. (10) (7) A committee, candidate, treasurer, or other individual designated as responsible for the committee's record keeping, report preparation, or report filing who fails to file a statement as required by this section shall pay a late filing fee. If the committee has raised less than $1,000.00 during the previous 2 years, the late filing fee is $25.00 for each business day the statement remains unfiled but not to exceed $100.00. If the committee has raised more than $1,000.00 but less than $10,000.00 or less during the previous 2 years, the late filing fee is $25.00 for each business day the statement remains unfiled, but not to exceed $500.00. If the committee has raised more than $10,000.00 during the previous 2 years, the late filing fee must not exceed $1,000.00, determined as follows: (a) Twenty-five dollars for each business day the report remains unfiled. (b) An additional $25.00 for each business day after the first 3 business days the report remains unfiled. (c) An additional $50.00 for each business day after the first 10 business days the report remains unfiled. (11) (8) If a candidate, treasurer, or other individual designated as responsible for the committee's record keeping, report preparation, or report filing fails to file 2 statements required by under this section or section 35 and both of the statements remain unfiled for more than 30 days, that candidate, treasurer, or other designated individual is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (12) If a treasurer or other individual designated as responsible for the record keeping, report preparation, or report filing of a ballot question committee fails to file a statement as required under subsection (4) for more than 7 days, the treasurer or other designated individual is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (13) (9) If a candidate is found guilty of a violation of this section, the circuit court for that county, on application by the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of that county, may prohibit that candidate from assuming the duties of a public office or from receiving compensation from public funds, or both. (14) (10) If a candidate, treasurer, or other individual designated as responsible for a committee's record keeping, report preparation, or report filing knowingly files an incomplete or inaccurate statement or report required by this section, that individual is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00. (15) (11) If a candidate, treasurer, or other individual designated as responsible for a committee's record keeping, report preparation, or report filing knowingly omits or underreports individual contributions or individual expenditures required to be disclosed by this act, that individual is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 or the amount of the contributions and expenditures omitted or underreported, whichever is greater. (16) (12) If a candidate committee's account has a balance of $20,000.00 or more and a candidate, treasurer, or other individual designated as responsible for that committee's record keeping, report preparation, or report filing fails to file campaign statements required under this act for 2 consecutive years, that candidate, treasurer, or other individual is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 3 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. Any money in a candidate committee account described in this subsection is subject to seizure by, and forfeiture to, this state as provided in this section. (17) (13) Not more than 5 business days after seizure of money under subsection (12), (16), the secretary of state shall deliver personally or by registered mail to the last known address of the candidate from whom the seizure was made an inventory statement of the money seized. The inventory statement must also contain notice to the effect that unless demand for hearing as provided in this section is made within 10 business days, the money is forfeited to this state. Within Not later than 10 business days after the date of service of the notice, the candidate may by registered mail, facsimile transmission, or personal service file with the secretary of state a demand for a hearing before the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state for a determination as to whether the money was lawfully subject to seizure and forfeiture. The candidate is entitled to appear before the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state, to be represented by counsel, and to present testimony and argument. Upon On receipt of a request for hearing, the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state shall hold the hearing within 15 business days. The hearing is not a contested case proceeding and is not subject to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. After the hearing, the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state shall render a decision in writing within not later than 10 business days of the hearing and, by order, shall either declare the money subject to seizure and forfeiture or declare the money returnable to the candidate. If, within not later than 10 business days after the date of service of the inventory statement, the candidate does not file with the secretary of state a demand for a hearing before the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state, the money seized is forfeited to this state by operation of law. If, after a hearing before the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state, the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state determines that the money is lawfully subject to seizure and forfeiture and the candidate does not appeal to the circuit court of the county in which the seizure was made within the time prescribed in this section, the money seized is forfeited to this state by operation of law. If a candidate is aggrieved by the decision of the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state, that candidate may appeal to the circuit court of the county where the seizure was made to obtain a judicial determination of the lawfulness of the seizure and forfeiture. The action must be commenced within not later than 20 days after notice of a determination by the secretary of state or a person designated by the secretary of state is sent to the candidate. The court shall hear the action and determine the issues of fact and law involved in accordance with rules of practice and procedure as in other in rem proceedings. Sec. 82. (1) The penalty provisions of this act shall do not apply to an act or omission occurring before December 1, 1977 except that a late filing fee shall is not be due or payable for an act or omission occurring before May 16, 1978 provided the act or omission is corrected before May 16, 1978. If a late filing fee has been paid before that date, it shall must be returned by the person who collected the late filing fee upon on written request of the person who paid the late filing fee. (2) A penalty or late filing fee imposed pursuant to under section 24 , 34, or former section 34 or 35 shall must neither be enforceable nor due or payable as a result of a person making expenditures of $200.00 or more as a contribution to a ballot question committee before October 15, 1981. If a person has paid a late filing fee as a result of an expenditure of $200.00 or more as a contribution to a ballot question committee before July 1, 1981, the late filing fee imposed pursuant to under section 24 , 34, or former section 34 or 35 shall must be returned by the person who collected the late filing fee upon on written request of the person who paid it. (3) Section 35 shall not take effect until June 30, 1978. Enacting section 1. Sections 34 and 35 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.234 and 169.235, are repealed.